Hawaii statutes.
§326-24 Rules. The director of health
may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for the conduct of all matters
pertaining to Hansen's disease, the treatment and care thereof, and other
services provided to persons affected with Hansen's disease, and the full and
complete governance of the county of Kalawao, except as limited by this
chapter. [L 1870, c 33, pt of §1; RL 1925, §1199; am L 1931, c 139, §5; am L
1933, c 118, §1; RL 1935, §1162; RL 1945, §2425; am L 1949, c 53, §17; am L
1951, c 157, §13; RL 1955, §50-26; am L 1965, c 96, §36; HRS §326-24; am L
1969, c 152, §6; am L 1981, c 185, §12; am L 1985, c 250, §10]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next